Virginia statutes. Title 11. Contracts.
Chapter 3. Gaming Contracts.

§ 11-14.
Gaming contracts void.

Except as otherwise provided in this section, all wagers, conveyances, assurances, and all contracts and securities whereof the whole or any part of the consideration is money or other valuable thing won, laid, or bet, at any game, horse race, sport or pastime, and all contracts to repay any money knowingly lent at the time and place of such game, race, sport or pastime, to any person for the purpose of so gaming, betting, or wagering, or to repay any money so lent to any person who shall, at such time and place, so pay, bet or wager, shall be utterly void.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a contract governing the distribution of state lottery proceeds shall be valid and enforceable as between the parties to the contract.

History.

Code 1919, § 5558; 1998, c. 400.

Cross references.

As to award of prize money for charitable games, see §

18.2-340.22

.

As to award of
prize money for pari-mutuel wager placed at racetrack or satellite facility, see § 59.1-364.

The 1998 amendment,

in the first paragraph, added “Except as otherwise provided in this section” and substituted “is money” for “be money,” and added the second paragraph.

Law Review.

For survey of Virginia commercial law for the year 1969-1970, see 56 Va. L. Rev. 1387 (1970).

For note, “Judicial Review of Arbitration Awards Under State Law,” 96 Va. L. Rev. 887 (2010).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

3C M.J. Commercial Law, § 61; 4A M.J. Contracts, § 39; 9A M.J. Gaming and Gaming Contracts, § 22.

§ 11-15.
Recovery of money or property lost in gaming.

Any person who shall, by playing at any game or betting on the sides or hands of such as play at any game, lose within twenty-four hours, the sum or value of five dollars, or more, and pay or deliver the same, or any part thereof, may, within three months next following, recover from the winner, the money or the value of the goods so lost and paid or delivered, with costs of suit in civil action, either by suit or warrant, according to the amount or value thereof.

History.

Code 1919, § 5559.

§ 11-16.
Bill by loser; repayment discharges winner from punishment.

Such loser may file a bill in equity against such winner, who shall answer the same, and upon discovery and repayment of the money or property so won, or its value, such winner shall be discharged from any forfeiture or punishment which he may have incurred for winning the same.

History.

Code 1919, § 5560.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

9A M.J. Gaming and Gaming Contracts, § 24.

§ 11-16.1.
Exemption from the chapter.

This chapter shall not apply to any bet, wager, or casino gaming permitted by Chapter 41 (§

58.1-4100

et seq.) of Title 58.1 or to any contract, conduct, or transaction arising from conduct lawful thereunder.

History.

2020, cc. 1197, 1248.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, cc. 1197 and 1248, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act may result in a net increase in periods of imprisonment or commitment. Pursuant to § 30-19.1:4 of the Code of Virginia, the estimated amount of the necessary appropriation cannot be determined for periods of imprisonment in state adult correctional facilities; therefore, Chapter 854 of the Acts of Assembly of 2019 requires the Virginia Criminal Sentencing Commission to assign a minimum fiscal impact of $50,000. Pursuant to § 30-19.1:4 of the Code of Virginia, the estimated amount of the necessary appropriation cannot be determined for periods of commitment to the custody of the Department of Juvenile Justice.”

Acts 2020, cc. 1197 and 1248, cl. 3 provides: “That the Virginia Lottery Board shall promulgate regulations to implement the provisions of this act to be effective within 280 days of its enactment.”

§ 11-16.2.
Exemption; authorized sports betting.

This chapter shall not apply to any sports betting or related activity that is lawful under Article 2 (§

58.1-4030

et seq.) of Chapter 40 of Title 58.1.

History.

2020, cc. 1218, 1256, §

11-16.1

.

The number of this section

was assigned by the Virginia Code Commission, the number in the 2020 acts having been §

11-16.1

.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, cc. 1218 and 1256, cl. 2 provides: “That the Virginia Lottery Board (the Board) shall promulgate regulations implementing the provisions of this act. The Board’s initial adoption of regulations shall be exempt from the Administrative Process Act (§

2.2-4000

et seq. of the Code of Virginia), except that the Board shall provide an opportunity for public comment on the regulations prior to adoption. The Board shall complete work on such regulations no later than September 15, 2020.”